Arkansas statutes. Title 2 Agriculture
Chapter 5

Domestic Fish Farming

Effective Dates. Acts 1961, No. 166, § 5: Mar. 6, 1961. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that many of the laws of this state are not clear as to the definition of fish farming, and that confusion often arises in interpreting many of such laws because of the lack of clarity as to the definition of the term ‘fish farming’ and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to clarify the definition of such term. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

2-5-101. Legislative intent.

In recognition of the fact that domestic fish farming has become an important part of the agricultural economy of this state, the General Assembly determines and declares that whenever any of the statutes, laws, or rules promulgated pursuant thereto shall use any of the following terms, the terms so used and when used shall be deemed and construed to include within the common or statutory definition the following:

“Agriculture” or “agricultural pursuit” or any similar term means the cultivation, growing, harvesting, or marketing of domesticated fish;

“Cultivated crop” means domesticated fish which are grown, managed, or harvested on an annual, semiannual, biennial, or short-interval basis; and

“Livestock” means domesticated fish which are grown, managed, harvested, or marketed as a cultivated crop.

History.

Acts 1961, No. 166, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1801.

2-5-102. Definition.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires, “domesticated fish” means any fish that are spawned and grown, managed, harvested, and marketed on an annual, semiannual, biennial, or short-term basis in privately owned waters as privately owned waters are defined in §15-43-301.

History.

Acts 1961, No. 166, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1802.

2-5-103. Game and Fish Commission not affected.

Nothing in this subchapter shall be interpreted or construed to affect, change, or alter any of the powers or controls over fish and wildlife in this state vested in the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission under Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 35.

History.

Acts 1961, No. 166, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1803.

Cross References. Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission, §15-41-102 et seq.

Subchapter 2

— Commercial Bait and Ornamental Fish Act

Cross References. Commercial Bait and Ornamental Fish Fund, §19-6-801.

2-5-201. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Commercial Bait and Ornamental Fish Act”.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1449, § 1.

2-5-202. Purpose.

The purpose of this subchapter is to:

Establish a voluntary certification program to provide high quality farm-raised bait and ornamental fish free of certain diseases, undesirable plants, undesirable animals, and other contaminants deemed injurious to the fish or fisheries;

Conduct programs to promote the use and sale of certified bait and ornamental fish raised in Arkansas; and

Provide state oversight of and funding from the beneficiaries of the program.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1449, § 1.

2-5-203. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Board” means the State Plant Board; and

“Person” means an individual, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, association, or two (2) or more individuals having a joint or common interest.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1449, § 1.

2-5-204. Powers and duties of State Plant Board.

The State Plant Board shall:

Administer this subchapter and the Commercial Bait and Ornamental Fish Fund;

Certify the commercial bait and ornamental fish that meet the standards and qualifications of the board under this subchapter;

Investigate methods of production and the occurrence of certain diseases, undesirable plants, undesirable animals, and other contaminants of commercial bait and ornamental fish and fisheries;

Conduct marketing programs to promote the use and sale of certified bait and ornamental fish raised in Arkansas; and

Promulgate all rules the board considers necessary or desirable to implement this subchapter.

The board shall establish in its rules the management practices, testing procedures, and appropriate science criteria required for certification under this subchapter.

The board may authorize the Director of the State Plant Board to appoint any deputy the board considers necessary to implement this subchapter.

Cross References. Commercial Bait and Ornamental Fish Fund, §19-6-801.

The certificate shall be displayed only by a person who is certified under this subchapter.

Cross References. Commercial Bait and Ornamental Fish Fund, §19-6-801.

Use the term “Arkansas certified” or any similar term concerning the quality of bait or ornamental fish without the proper certification from the State Plant Board;

Falsely advertise or represent any bait or ornamental fish as being certified by the board;

Use any emblem, label, or language for the purpose of misleading a person into believing that any bait or ornamental fish has been certified by the board when the certification has not been obtained;

Misuse any tag, label, or certificate issued by the board;

Obtain or attempt to obtain the certification of any bait or ornamental fish by making a false statement or misrepresentation to the board or to the board's inspectors, deputies, or agents;

Violate any rule of the board under this subchapter; or

Violate any agreement made as a condition for receiving a certificate.

The decision of the board on appeal is final.

Amendments. The 2007 amendment substituted “violation” for “misdemeanor” in (b), and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment deleted “or regulation” following “rule” in (a)(6).

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1449, § 1.

2-5-205. Certificates.

A person that has met the standards and qualifications established by the State Plant Board under this subchapter shall receive from the board a commercial bait and ornamental fish certificate.

The certificate shall be in the form prescribed by the board and shall attest that the commercial bait and ornamental fish covered by the certificate have met the standards and qualifications established by the board under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1449, § 1.

2-5-206. Fees.

The State Plant Board may prescribe application, certification, and other fees to cover the costs of inspection, certification, and marketing under this subchapter.

All fees collected under this subchapter shall be deposited into the Commercial Bait and Ornamental Fish Fund to be used by the board to administer this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1449, § 1.

2-5-207. Unlawful acts — Penalties — Revocation of certificate.

It is unlawful for any person to:

Any person who pleads guilty or nolo contendere to or is found guilty of violating this section is guilty of a violation and shall be punished by a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense.

(1)A certificate issued under this subchapter may be revoked by the Director of the State Plant Board after a hearing before the director, regardless of whether a prosecution is commenced.

(A)Any person whose certificate is revoked by the director is entitled to an appeal to the board.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1449, § 1; 2007, No. 827, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 3.

2-5-208. Intergovernmental cooperation.

In administering this subchapter, the State Plant Board shall cooperate to the fullest extent possible with other agencies of the state and the federal government.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1449, § 1; 2007, No. 827, § 2.

Amendments. The 2007 amendment substituted “shall cooperate” for “may cooperate”.